Utah statutes.
76-8-801.   Definitions.

For the purpose of this part:

(1)  "Highway" includes any private or public street, way, or other place used for travel to or from property.

(2)  "Highway commissioners" means any individual, board, or other body having authority under then existing law to discontinue the use of the highway which it is desired to restrict or close to public use and travel.

(3)  "Public utility" includes any pipeline, gas, electric, heat, water, oil, sewer, telephone, telegraph, radio, railway, railroad, airplane, transportation communication or other system by whomsoever owned or operated for public use.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

